Utah statutes.
17-50-502.   Change of class of county.

(1)  Each county shall retain its classification under Section 17-50-501 until changed as provided in this section.

(2)  The lieutenant governor shall monitor the population figure for each county as shown on:

(a)  each official census or census estimate of the United States Bureau of the Census; or

(b)  if the population figure for a county is not available from the United States Bureau of the Census, the population estimate from the Utah Population Estimates Committee.

(3)  If the applicable population figure under Subsection (2) indicates that a county's population has increased beyond the limit for its current class, the lieutenant governor shall:

(a)  prepare a certificate indicating the class in which the county belongs based on the increased population figure; and

(b)  within 10 days after preparing the certificate, deliver a copy of the certificate to the legislative body and, if the county has an executive that is separate from the legislative body, the executive of the county whose class was changed.

(4)  A county's change in class is effective on the date of the lieutenant governor's certificate under Subsection (3).

